Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3808.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.303, is amended to read: 97B.303 VENISON DONATIONS. new text begin (a) new text end An individual who legally takes a deer may donate the deer, for distribution to charitable food assistance programs, to a meat processor that is licensed under chapter 28A. An individual donating a deer must supply the processor with the licensee's DNR number under which the deer was taken. new text begin (b) An individual must supply the processor with the entire deer carcass with the hide attached. new text end new text begin (c) The processor may process a portion of the deer carcass for the donator's use if the donator requests a portion and the donator pays the cost to process the portion that the donator requests. new text end